Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.900

Liberal construction.

The rule of strict construction shall have no application to this chapter, but the same shall be liberally construed in all respects in order to carry out the purposes and objects for which this chapter is intended.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.900. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 56.]